New Jersey, session 222, S4244.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Affiliate means an entity owned or controlled by an owner or under common control with the owner. Borrower means a mortgagor of a mortgage loan. Commissioner means the Commissioner of Community Affairs. Deed in lieu means a deed for the collateral property, that the mortgagee accepts from the borrower in exchange for the release of the borrowers obligation under the mortgage loan. Department means the Department of Community Affairs. Designee means a nonprofit organization, a municipal or county housing authority, or a controlled nonprofit or for-profit affiliate of either entity; provided that the parent organization has requisite experience in developing, owning, or operating residential real estate and with the financial capacity to secure the financing of the purchase transaction; provided that any purchase by a designee under P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be for the purpose of the use of the property as an inclusionary development. Earnest money deposit means a money deposit provided from the purchaser to the seller as part of the purchase contract in order to demonstrate actual intent to purchase the property. "Elderly tenant household means a tenant household in which one or more of the residents are age 65 or older. Multiple dwelling means a building or structure meeting the definition of multiple dwelling set forth in the Hotel and Multiple Dwelling Law, P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-1 et seq.). Immediate family member means the parent, offspring, sibling, or spouse of the owner. Inclusionary development means a residential housing development in which, unless otherwise approved by the commissioner based on project feasibility, no less than 25 percent of the housing units are committed to be affordable housing for households with income of less than 80 percent of the area median income for households of the same size and composition. Minimum tenant participation percentage means 51 percent of the tenant-occupied housing units of the multiple dwelling.  The minimum tenant participation percentage shall be calculated, rounded up, based on the number of tenant-occupied housing units in a property, rather than the number of individual tenants.  If there is more than one tenant residing in a unit, any of the tenants in the unit may participate as members of the tenant association for the unit to be counted towards the participating percentage of units.  The minimum tenant participation percentage shall be presumed to have been achieved for a period of one year after it is initially established. Mortgage loan means a loan secured wholly or partially by a mortgage on a multiple dwelling. Mortgagee means an entity to whom property is mortgaged, the mortgage creditor or lender including, but not limited to, mortgage servicers, lenders in a mortgage agreement and any agent, servant or employee of the mortgagee or any successor in interest or assignee of the mortgagee's rights, interests or obligations under the mortgage agreement. Owner means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, trust, organization, limited liability company, or other entity, or its successors or assigns, that holds title to real property. Purchaser means a party who has entered into a purchase contract with an owner and who will, upon performance of the purchase contract, become the new owner of the property. Purchase contract means a binding written agreement whereby an owner agrees to sell property including, without limitation, a purchase and sale agreement, contract of sale, purchase option or other similar instrument. Sale means an act by which an owner conveys, transfers, or disposes of property by deed or otherwise, whether through a single transaction or a series of transactions, within a three-year period; provided, that a disposition of housing by an owner to an affiliate of the owner shall not constitute a sale. Short-sale means a sale approved by the mortgagee to a bona fide purchaser at a price that is less than the borrower's existing debt on the multiple dwelling. State agency means any office, department, board, commission, bureau, division, agency, or instrumentality of the State. Successor means the entity through which a tenant association may take title to the residential property, including any of the following: (1) a nonprofit or for-profit entity controlled by the tenant association; (2) a cooperative, as defined in section 3 of The Cooperative Recording Act of New Jersey, P.L.1987, c.381 (C.46:8D-3), in either case controlled by the tenants of the property; or (3) a joint venture between any of such entities and another party with: (a) the requisite experience in acquiring, developing and owning residential property, and (b) the financial capacity to secure financing of the purchase transaction; any such joint venture shall be for the purpose of the use of the property as an inclusionary development. Tenant means a person entitled to possession or occupancy of a rental unit within residential housing, including a subtenant, lessee and sublessee. Tenant association means an organization, with a membership limited to present tenants of a property that is an incorporated nonprofit organization.  Tenant association means the tenant association itself, or a successor entity or a designee selected pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). Third-party offer means an offer to purchase the mortgaged property for valuable consideration by an arm's length purchaser; provided, that a third-party offer shall not include an offer by the borrower or the tenant association. Third-party purchaser means a purchaser that is not the tenant association of the property. 2.    a.  An owner of a multiple dwelling shall: (1)   notify the department, the tenant association of the property, as applicable, and each residential tenant household of the property, in writing by hand delivery or by mail, of the owner's intention to sell the property, an action that shall be deemed to include the consideration of an unsolicited offer from a third-party to purchase the property; and (2) provide a tenant association with the minimum tenant participation percentage, an opportunity to purchase the property prior to entering into an agreement to sell the property pursuant to the time periods established pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), although an owner shall not be under an obligation to enter into an agreement to sell the property to a tenant association. b.  A tenant association with the minimum tenant participation percentage may select a successor entity or a designee to act on its behalf as purchaser of the multiple dwelling and shall provide the owner and the department with notice of its selection. c.  A tenant association with the minimum tenant participation percentage may, within 30 days following receipt of the owner's intention to sell, demonstrated though the submission of a copy of a third-party contract pursuant to subsection d. of this section, submit an offer to the owner to purchase the property.  Failure to submit a timely offer shall constitute an irrevocable waiver of the tenants' rights under this subsection and the owner may enter into a contract to sell the property to a third-party, subject to subsections d. through f. of this section.  If the owner and the tenant association have not entered into an agreement within 30 days after receipt of the notice of the owner's intent to sell, the owner may enter into an agreement to sell the property to a third-party, subject to subsections d. through g. of this section. d.    Upon execution of any purchase contract with a third party, the owner shall, within seven days, submit a copy of the executed contract and proof that the deposit toward the purchase has been paid by the third party along with an alternative proposed purchase contract to the tenant association, providing the tenant association with an opportunity to execute the contract.  If the tenant association elects to purchase the property, the tenant association shall within 30 days after the receipt of the third-party purchase contract and the proposed purchase contract, execute the proposed purchase contract or other agreement as is acceptable to both parties.  A tenant association that exists at this time shall be authorized to exercise this authority.  The time periods set forth in this section may be extended by agreement between the owner and the tenant association.  Except as otherwise specified in subsection e. of this section, the terms and conditions of the proposed purchase contract offered to the tenant association shall be the same as those of the executed third-party purchase contract.  A tenant association that acts to purchase the property shall demonstrate good faith intent to purchase, including evidence of financial capacity or engagement with a lender or qualified designee. e.     Any purchase contract offered to, or proposed by, the tenant association shall provide the following terms at a minimum: (1)   the earnest money deposit required by the owner of the tenant association shall not exceed the lesser of: (a)   the deposit in the third-party purchase contract; (b)   five percent of the sale price; or (c)   $250,000; provided, however, that the owner and the tenant association may agree to modify the terms of the earnest money deposit; provided, further, that the earnest money deposit shall be held under commercially-reasonable terms by an escrow agent selected jointly by the owner and the tenant association; (2)   the owner shall provide the following information, documentation, and permissions, within 30 days of the date of the purchase contract to the tenant association: (a)   an updated rent roll with names of all tenants; (b)   documentation of all operating expenses for the prior two years, including utilities, insurance premiums, bills for repairs, and capital improvements; (c)   permission to inspect all common and maintenance service areas of the property, including roof, boiler room, electrical and telecommunications rooms; (d)   permission to conduct inspections and tests for the presence of lead paint and asbestos; and (e)   permission to do tests for regulated environmental toxins on unbuilt areas of the property, if required by the lender of the tenant association; (3)   the contract shall contain all reasonable contingencies, including financing, marketability of title, and appraisal contingencies; (4)   the earnest money deposit shall be refundable for not less than 90 days from the date of execution of the purchase contract or a greater period as provided for in the third-party purchase contract; provided, however, that if the owner unreasonably delays the buyer's ability to conduct due diligence during the 90 day period, the earnest money deposit shall continue to be refundable for an additional period of one day for every day beyond 30 days that the owner has not complied with paragraph (2) of this subsection.  After the expiration of the specified time period, the earnest money deposit shall become non-refundable, but shall continue to be a deposit toward the full purchase price; and (5)  an explanation of the required timing for payments of real estate broker commissions or fees associated with a purchase. f.     For the purposes of a sales contract entered pursuant to P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a tenant association shall have 120 days from execution of the purchase and sale agreement to perform all due diligence, secure financing for and close on the purchase of the building.  Failure to exercise the purchase option within 120 days shall constitute a waiver of the purchase option by the tenant association.  The 120-day period may be extended by agreement of both parties. g.  If the tenant association does not exercise its purchase option, the owner may proceed with the sale to the third-party.  If the closing date in the third-party contract is extended, for each extension, the owner shall provide the department and the tenant association an amendment to the purchase contract extending the date of the closing.  Within seven days of the termination of the third-party purchase contract, the owner shall notify the department and the tenant association of the termination.  The notice, if required pursuant to this subsection, shall re-initiate the provisions of this section. h.  The tenant association shall ensure that its purchase of the property shall not result in the displacement of one or more elderly tenant households that choose not to participate in the purchase of the property. i.  The department shall develop sample purchase contracts, incorporating the requirements of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and publish the sample purchase contracts on the departments Internet website to ensure that an owner is able to provide the document to a tenant association. j.  A multiple dwelling containing fewer than 10 residential units shall be subject to an expedited process, as determined by the commissioner, including reduced notice and response timeframes. 3.  a.  An owner of a multiple dwelling shall provide notice to the tenant association, as applicable, and each tenant household of the intention to sell the multiple dwelling by way of short-sale to avoid foreclosure.  This notice shall be mailed with a simultaneous copy to the department within two business days of the owner's submission of a request or application to the mortgagee for permission to sell the multiple dwelling by way of short-sale or to accept a deed in lieu.  This notice shall also include a notice of tenant rights, in accordance with the sample notice provided by the commissioner pursuant to section 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.  (1)  A mortgagee of a multiple dwelling shall not accept a third-party offer or deem the owner's application for short-sale submitted for review unless: (a)  the mortgagee receives documentation demonstrating that the tenants of the multiple dwelling have been informed of the owner's intent to seek a short-sale or deed in lieu and the tenant association has had the opportunity to express their interest in exercising a right of first refusal within 60 days; (b)  the tenant association has had the opportunity to assign its right of first refusal; or (c)  the tenant association has waived those rights. (2)  If the tenant association has not affirmatively expressed an interest in exercising a right of first refusal or in assigning that right within 60 days, and has not affirmatively waived that right within 60 days, these rights of the tenant association shall be deemed waived. c.  Before a multiple dwelling may be transferred by short-sale or deed in lieu, the owner of the multiple dwelling shall notify each tenant household, with a simultaneous copy to the department, by regular mail, of any bona fide offer that the mortgagee intends to accept.  If households constituting at least 51 percent of the households occupying the multiple dwelling notify the owner, in writing, that they collectively desire to receive information relating to the proposed sale, then, before any short-sale or transfer by deed in lieu, the owner shall provide each tenant household a notice of the offer.  Tenants may indicate this desire within the same notice described in subsection b. of this section.  Any notice of the offer required to be provided pursuant to this section shall include the price, calculated as a single lump sum amount and any promissory notes offered in lieu of cash payment. d.  A tenant association representing at least 51 percent of the households occupying the multiple dwelling that are entitled to notice under subsection c. of this section shall have the collective right to purchase, in the case of a third-party offer that the mortgagee intends to accept, provided that the tenant association: (1)  submits to the owner reasonable evidence that the tenants of at least 51 percent of the occupied units in the multiple dwelling have approved the purchase of the multiple dwelling; (2)  submits to the owner a proposed purchase and sale agreement on substantially equivalent terms and conditions within 60 days of receipt of notice of the offer made pursuant to subsection c. of this section; (3)  obtains a binding commitment for any necessary financing or guarantees within an additional 90 days after execution of the purchase and sale agreement; and (4) closes on the purchase within an additional 90 days after the end of the 90-day period described in paragraph (3) of this subsection. e.  An owner shall not unreasonably refuse to enter into, or unreasonably delay the execution or closing on a purchase and sale with the tenant association when the tenant association has made a bona fide offer to meet the price and substantially equivalent terms and conditions of an offer for which notice is required to be given pursuant to subsection c. of this section.  Failure of the tenant association to submit a purchase and sale agreement within the first 60-day period, to obtain a binding commitment for financing within the additional 90-day period, or to close on the purchase within the second 90-day period, shall serve to terminate the rights of the tenant association to purchase.  The time periods provided pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) may be extended by mutual agreement, or, if expressly authorized by the commissioner, may be waived in circumstances involving imminent foreclosure, financial distress, or other exigent circumstances.  The provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not be construed to require an owner to provide financing to the tenant association.  A tenant association that has the right to purchase in association with a short sale, at its election, may, for the purpose of maintaining the use of the multiple dwelling as an inclusionary development, assign its purchase right to: (1)   the municipality in which the multiple dwelling is located; (2)   the housing authority of the municipality or county in which the multiple dwelling is located; (3)   a State agency; or (4)   a nonprofit entity, a community development corporation, a developer of inclusionary developments, or land trust. f.     The right of first refusal established in this section shall commence for the tenant association for the time periods provided in this section, beginning on the date of notice to the tenants under subsection a. of this section.  The effective period for the right of first refusal shall begin anew for each different offer to purchase that the mortgagee intends to accept.  The right of first refusal shall not apply with respect to any offer received by the owner for which a notice is not required pursuant to subsection c. of this section. 4.  a.  In any instance in which a tenant association is not the successful purchaser, the seller of the multiple dwelling shall provide evidence of compliance with P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) by filing an affidavit of compliance with the department within seven days of the sale. b.  P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not apply to the following: (1)   property that is the subject of a taking by eminent domain or a negotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain; (2)   a proposed sale to a purchaser pursuant to terms and conditions that preserve affordability; (3)   any sale of housing that the commissioner has determined, by rule or regulation, shall not be subject to the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), because the housing is subject to a form of public assistance that makes the sale incompatible with the requirements of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); (4)  rental units in any hospital, skilled nursing facility, or health facility; (5)  rental units in a nonprofit facility that has the primary purpose of providing short term treatment, assistance, or therapy for alcohol, drug, or other substance abuse; provided, that the housing is incident to the recovery program, and where the client has been informed in writing of the temporary or transitional nature of the housing; (6)  rental units in a nonprofit facility that provides a structured living environment that has the primary purpose of helping homeless persons obtain the skills necessary for independent living in a permanent housing and in which occupancy is restricted to a limited and specific period of time of not more than 24 months and where the client has been informed in writing of the temporary or transitional nature of the housing at its inception; (7)  public housing units owned or managed by a municipality, county, the State or the federal government, or any agency or instrumentality thereof; (8)  a residential property for which the ownership consists of one or more natural persons who are residents of the State, and who, together and separately, own no more than six residential rental units; (9)  any unit that is held in trust on behalf of a disabled individual who permanently occupies the unit, or a unit that is permanently occupied by a disabled parent, sibling, child, or grandparent of the owner of that unit; (10)  any property that is owned by a college or university that is occupied primarily by students; or (11)  any sale to an immediate family member of the owner for a total purchase price below the assessed value of the property. c.  A tenant, tenant association, or assignee shall not solicit or accept payment or any other consideration for assigning or waiving any rights under P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 5.  The Department of Community Affairs, in coordination with the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, shall establish guidance and technical assistance programs to support tenant associations in securing financing for the purpose of making offers to purchase property pursuant to subsection c. of section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 6.    In response to a violation of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) that results in the inability of the tenant association to purchase a multiple dwelling, an aggrieved tenant, tenant association, or assignee may seek damages pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The Attorney General shall have authority to accept complaints, and enforce P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to section 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The Attorney General may seek compensatory relief on behalf of tenants and the State in a court of competent jurisdiction.  The provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not be construed to limit or constrain in any way the rights tenants otherwise possess under State law.  In determining damages, a court shall consider whether the owner acted in good faith compliance with the requirements of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and shall assess appropriate penalties if the owner did not act in good faith. 7.  In consultation with the Attorney General and the Administrative Director of the Courts, the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall promulgate, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to effectuate P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). a.  The commissioner shall post a sample intent to sell notice, a sample proof of notice to tenants, a sample notice of offer, a sample notice of tenant rights, and other necessary documents on the departments Internet website. b.  The rules and regulations of the commissioner shall include guidance for actions that shall constitute an unreasonable refusal to enter into, or an unreasonable delay in the execution or closing on a purchase and sale with a tenant association when the tenant association has made a bona fide offer to meet the price and substantially equivalent terms and conditions of an offer for which notice is required to be given pursuant to subsection c. of section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The commissioner shall define an unreasonable delay to include objective benchmarks, including failure to respond within specified timeframes or refusal without a documented justification. c.  The rules and regulations of the commissioner shall provide for the use of standardized forms, the use of which shall be establish a rebuttable presumption of compliance. 8.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following enactment, and shall apply to a new contract of sale entered on or subsequent to that date.